Hawaii statutes.
§264-9 Backfilling, repaving, repairing,
expense of permit holder. (a) All excess materials remaining at the site
of the work done under any permit shall be removed at the expense of the permit
holder. The excess material shall not be deposited or placed within any
highway right-of-way except with the approval of the director of transportation
or the director's authorized representative.

(b) The permit holder, at the permit holder's
own expense and upon completion of the work for which the permit was issued,
shall backfill all trenches or other openings and make all necessary repairs to
or replacement of any concrete gutter, curb, sidewalk, or any other structure
in public use and restore or replace any plants, landscaping, signs, markers,
or other facilities or improvements that were cut or damaged by the permit
holder to a condition similar to that which existed before work was begun under
the permit.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in section
264-33, the permit holder shall be responsible for all costs in the
installation, construction, repair, removal, restoration, reconstruction or
replacement of any improvement within the right-of-way of any state highway. [L
1967, c 163, pt of §2; HRS §264-9; am L 1971, c 15, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next